Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202586-1603
Commission; powers; act; applicability.

(1) The commission may require disclosure of information from telecommunications carriers as necessary to implement and enforce the Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation Act.

(2) The commission may maintain the confidentiality of any information collected under the Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation Act that is claimed to be confidential for containing proprietary or commercial information and withhold such information from public disclosure pursuant to subdivision (3) of section 84-712.05.

(3) The Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation Act shall not affect or modify:

(a) The enforcement of criminal or civil laws, including, but not limited to, laws concerning consumer protection and unfair or deceptive trade practices which apply generally to the conduct of business;

(b) Any entity's obligations or rights or commission authority under section 86-122 and under 47 U.S.C. 251 and 252, as such sections existed on January 1, 2019, and any carrier-to-carrier tariff rates, wholesale service quality standards, interconnection agreements, or other obligations for which the commission has jurisdiction under state or federal law;

(c) Any requirement to contribute to any fund administered by the commission authorized by the 911 Service System Act, the Telecommunications Relay System Act, or the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund Act;

(d) Any commission jurisdiction over intrastate switched access rates, terms, and conditions, including the resolution of disputes arising from, and implementation of federal and state law with respect to, intercarrier compensation;

(e) The eligibility and requirements for the receipt of funds from the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund and the rules, regulations, and orders under the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund Act or the receipt of funds from the federal Universal Service Fund, regardless of the unregulated status of the provider's service under the Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation Act;

(f) Any entity's rights and obligations with respect to (i) registration under section 86-125, (ii) the use of public streets, roads, highways, and rights-of-way, or (iii) a certificate of public convenience and necessity or a permit;

(g) The commission's authority under the 911 Service System Act or the Telecommunications Relay System Act;

(h) Any provision of the Rural Communications Sustainability Act; and

(i) The commission's authority to apply or enforce statutory or regulatory provisions against an incumbent local exchange carrier in a deregulated exchange if such statutory or regulatory provisions could otherwise be applicable to a competitive local exchange carrier.

Laws 2025, LB311, § 3.

Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund Act, see section 86-316.

911 Service System Act, see section 86-1032.

Rural Communications Sustainability Act, see section 86-1501.

Telecommunications Relay System Act, see section 86-301.